Hawaii statutes.
§302A-406 Transportation of school
children. (a) The department may provide suitable transportation to and
from school and for educational field trips for all children in grades
kindergarten to twelve and in special education classes. The department shall
adopt policies, procedures, and programs as it deems necessary to provide
suitable transportation.

(b) The department shall adopt rules under
chapter 91 governing the supervision and administration of the transportation
of school children under this section. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2010, c
167, §5; am L 2013, c 257, §2]

Cross References

Interference with the operator of a public transit vehicle,
see §711-1112.

State function, see §27-11.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next